Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 14.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1915
Award; conditions.

An
award may be granted to an eligible student for attendance at an eligible
postsecondary educational institution if:

(1) The eligible student is accepted for enrollment as follows:

(a) In the case of an eligible student beginning his or her first year
in attendance at an eligible postsecondary educational institution, such eligible
student has satisfied requirements for admission and has enrolled or indicated
an intent to enroll in an eligible postsecondary educational institution;
or

(b) In the case of an eligible student enrolled in an eligible postsecondary
educational institution following the successful completion of the student's
first year in attendance, such eligible student continues to meet the requirements
of the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Act and
has maintained the minimum standards of performance as required by the eligible
postsecondary educational institution in which the eligible student is enrolled;

(2) The eligible student receiving such award certifies that the award
will be used only for educational expenses; and

(3) The eligible student has complied with the act and its rules and
regulations.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 15;

Laws 2010, LB956, § 14.